Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1928.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin 30,000 FEET BLACK ARTS AND TECHNICAL TRAINING CENTER.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to 30,000 Feet, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to design, construct, furnish, and equip the renovation and expansion of a Black Arts and Tech Center in the city of St. Paul, to include an outdoor performance space, multidisciplinary art room, and dance space, to provide tech training and programming to youth who live in poverty. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 42, and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end